California statutes. Insurance Code
All premiums, reserves, investment income, and all property of whatsoever kind derived or acquired by the fund from its transaction of insurance pursuant to the United States Longshoremen’s and Harbor Workers’ Compensation Act shall be maintained and identified in separate accounts and records.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 507.)
-------------------------------------------

11803.

All claims, costs of doing business, liabilities, expenses, and obligations arising out of or related to the fund’s transaction of insurance pursuant to the United States Longshoremen’s and Harbor Workers’ Compensation Act shall be paid and charged to the income of whatsoever nature derived from its United States Longshoremen’s and Harbor Workers’ Compensation Act insurance business only.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 507.)
-------------------------------------------

11804.

Joint or shared use of office building space, whether owned, leased or rented, and the joint use of all furniture, automobiles, office equipment, supplies and services shall be charged to each class of insurance business on an equitable and proportional basis.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 507.)
-------------------------------------------

11805.

The State Compensation Insurance Fund shall report annually to the Legislature as soon after the close of the calendar year as is feasible, with respect to its experience handling United States longshoremen’s and harbor workers’ insurance pursuant to this chapter, including, but not limited to, a statement of resources and liabilities at the close of each annual period commencing December 31, 1979.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 507.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Rates [11820. - 11822.]

11820.

Subject to the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 11730) of Chapter 3, the board of directors shall establish the rates to be charged by the State Compensation Insurance Fund for insurance issued by it. These rates shall be fixed with due regard to the physical hazards of each industry, occupation, or employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 6, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

11821.

Within each class of business insured such rates shall be fixed, so far as practicable, in accordance with the following elements:

(a) Bodily risk or safety, or other hazard of the plant, premises or work of each insured employer.

(b) The manner in which the work is conducted.

(c) A reasonable regard for the accident experience and history of each such insured.

(d) A reasonable regard for the insured’s means and methods of caring for injured persons.

Such rates shall take no account of the extent to which the employees in any particular establishment have or have not persons dependent upon them for support.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

11822.

The rates fixed by the board of directors shall be that percentage of the payroll of any employer which, in the long run and on the average, will produce a sufficient sum, when invested in a way as to realize the maximum return consistent with safe and prudent management practices:

(a) To carry all claims to maturity. The rates shall be based upon the “reserve” and not upon the “assessment” plan.

(b) To meet the reasonable expenses of conducting the business of the fund.

(c) To produce a reasonable surplus to cover the catastrophe hazard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 6, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Policies [11840. - 11846.]

11840.

The insurance contracts or policies of the State Compensation Insurance Fund may be either limited or unlimited. The insurance contracts or policies may be issued for like periods as are allowed by law to other workers’ compensation insurers or, in the form of stamps or tickets or otherwise, for one month, for any number of months less than one year, for one day, for any number of days less than one month or during the performance of any particular work, job or contract. The rates charged shall be proportionately greater for a shorter than for a longer period and a minimum premium charge shall be fixed in accordance with a reasonable rate for insuring one person for one day.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

11841.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent:

(a) Any applicant for insurance from being covered temporarily until the application is finally acted upon.

(b) An insured from surrendering any policy at any time and having returned to him the difference between the premium paid and the premium at the customary short term for the shorter period which such policy has already run.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

11843.

The State Compensation Insurance Fund may issue policies including, with their employees, employers who perform labor incidental to their occupations, and including also members of the families of such employers engaged in the same occupation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

11844.

Such policies covering employers shall insure to such employers and working members of their families the same compensations provided for their employees, and at the same rates.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

11845.

The estimations of the wage values, respectively, of such insured employers and members of their families shall be reasonable and shall be separately stated in and added to the valuation of the pay rolls upon which their premium is computed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

11846.

The policies may likewise be sold to self-employing persons and to casual employees. The insureds, for the purpose of the insurance, shall be deemed to be employees within the meaning of the workers’ compensation laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 309.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Reports and Statements [11860. - 11860.]

11860.

Each quarter the president of the State Compensation Insurance Fund shall make a report to the Governor of the business done by the State Compensation Insurance Fund during the previous quarter and a statement of the fund’s resources and liabilities at the close of that previous quarter. The State Compensation Insurance Fund shall, at its own expense, hire a recognized firm of certified public accountants to audit annually the books and records of the State Compensation Insurance Fund and cause an abstract summary thereof to be published one or more times in at least two newspapers of general circulation in the state. The president of the fund shall additionally provide the commissioner with all reports required by law to be made to him or her by other insurers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 6, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Coverage of Public Employers [11870. - 11874.]

11870.

The state, any agency, department, division, commission, board, bureau, officer or other authority thereof, and each county, city and county, city, school district, irrigation district, any other district established by law, or other public corporation or quasi public corporation within the state, including any public utility operated by a private corporation may insure against its liability for compensation with the State Compensation Insurance Fund. Where the state or any agency, department, division, commission, board, bureau, officer or authority thereof is the insured, the premium for that insurance shall be a proper charge against any moneys appropriated for the support of or expenditure by the insured, except that in the case of an insured supported by or authorized to expend moneys appropriated out of more than one fund, the insured, with the approval of the Director of Finance, may determine the proportion of the premium to be paid out of each fund. In that case the insured, with the approval of the Director of Finance, may pay the entire premium out of any of those funds and thereafter the funds used for payment shall be reimbursed in proper proportion out of the other funds. In case a county, city and county, city, school district, irrigation district, or other district established by law, or other public corporation or quasi public corporation within the state is the insured, the premium therefor shall be a proper charge against the general fund of the insured.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 373, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

11871.

The State Compensation Insurance Fund may enter into a master agreement with the Department of Human Resources to render services in the adjustment and disposition of claims for workers’ compensation to any state agencies, including any officer, department, division, bureau, commission, board or authority, not insured with the fund.

The master agreement shall provide for rendition of services at a uniform rate to all agencies, except that the rate for the Department of the California Highway Patrol may be fixed independently of the uniform rate.

The fund may, in accordance with the agreement, adjust and dispose of claims for workers’ compensation made by an officer or employee of any state agency not insured with the fund.

The fund may make all expenditures, including payment to claimants for medical care or for adjustment or settlement of claims, necessary to the adjustment and final disposition of claims. The agreement shall provide that the state agency whose officer or employee is a claimant shall reimburse the fund for the expenditures and for the actual cost of services rendered.

The fund may in its own name, or in the name of the state agency for which the services are performed, do any and all things necessary to recover on behalf of the state agency for which it renders service any and all amounts which an employer might recover from third persons under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 3850) of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Labor Code, or which an insurer might recover pursuant to Section 11662 including the right to commence and prosecute actions, to file, pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 3850) of Part 1 of Division 4 of
 the Labor Code, liens for whatever sums would be recoverable by suit against a third person, to intervene in other court proceedings, and to compromise claims and actions before or after commencement of suit or after entry of judgment when in the opinion of the fund full collection cannot be enforced.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 665, Sec. 173.   (SB 1308)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

11872.

The fund may annually enter into agreements with state agencies for service to be rendered to the fund. These state agencies include, but shall not be limited to: the Department of Finance, Department of General Services, State Personnel Board, and the Public Employees’ Retirement System. If these agencies and the fund cannot agree upon the cost of services provided by the agreements, the Department of General Services shall be requested to arrive at an equitable settlement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 177.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

11873.

(a) Except as provided by subdivision (b), the fund shall not be subject to the provisions of the Government Code made applicable to state agencies generally or collectively, unless the section specifically names the fund as an agency to which the provision applies.

(b) The fund shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 10.3 (commencing with Section 3512) of Division 4 of Title 1 of, Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of, Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 8543) of Division 1 of Title 2 of, Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of, the Government Code, and Division 5 (commencing with Section 18000) of
 Title 2 of the Government Code, with the exception of all of the following provisions of that division:

(1) Article 1 (commencing with Section 19820) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 19823) of Chapter 2 of Part 2.6 of Division 5.

(2) Sections 19849.2, 19849.3, 19849.4, and 19849.5.

(3) Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 19993.1) of Part 2.6 of Division 5.

(c) Except as provided in subdivisions (d) and (e) for the period from July 1, 2012, to June 30, 2013, inclusive, and for the period from July 1, 2020, to June 30, 2021, inclusive, and notwithstanding any provision of the Government Code or any other provision of law, the positions funded by
 the State Compensation Insurance Fund are exempt from any hiring freezes and staff cutbacks otherwise required by law. This subdivision is declaratory of existing law.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, employees of the fund shall, without limitation, be subject to any and all reductions in state employee compensation imposed by the Legislature on other state employees for the period from July 1, 2012, to June 30, 2013, inclusive, and for the period from July 1, 2020, to June 30, 2021, inclusive, regardless of the means adopted to effect those reductions.

(e) With the exception of the reductions authorized in subdivision (d), if any provision of this section, or any practice or procedure adopted pursuant to this section, is in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum
 of understanding reached pursuant to Section 3517.5 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if the provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 315.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

11874.

On the effective date of this act the Controller shall draw his or her warrant in favor of the State Compensation Insurance Fund for the total amount of the funds in the custody of the Treasurer belonging to the State Compensation Insurance Fund, and the Treasurer shall pay that warrant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 426, Sec. 11.   (SB 712)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Penalties [11880. - 11881.]

11880.

(a) It is unlawful to make or cause to be made any knowingly false or fraudulent statement, whether made orally or in writing, of any fact material to the determination of the premium, rate, or cost of any policy of workers’ compensation insurance issued or administered by the State Compensation Insurance Fund for the purpose of reducing the premium, rate, or cost of the insurance. Any person convicted of violating this subdivision shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for one year, or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for two, three, or five years, or by a fine not exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or double the value of the fraud, whichever is greater, or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(b) Any person who violates subdivision (a) and who has a prior felony conviction of the offense set forth in that subdivision shall receive a two-year enhancement for each prior conviction in addition to the sentence provided in subdivision (a). The existence of any fact that would subject a person to a penalty enhancement shall be alleged in the information or indictment and either admitted by the defendant in open court, or found to be true by the jury trying the issue of guilt or by the court where guilt is established by plea of guilty or nolo contendere or by trial by the court sitting without a jury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 218.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

11881.

Whenever in Chapter 4, Part 3, Division 2 of the Insurance Code the term “State Industrial Accident Commission” or “Industrial Accident Commission” or “commission” or “director” or similar designation occurs, it means the Board of Directors of the State Compensation Insurance Fund except when such meaning is inconsistent with the intent and context of said chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1431.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Transfer of Ownership [11885. - 11886.2.]

11885.

(a) The Director of Finance is hereby authorized to act as agent for the state and, in that capacity, to sell a portion of, or otherwise obtain value for, the State Compensation Insurance Fund’s assets and liabilities. That authorized sale or other disposition shall be transacted with an entity that the director, in consultation with the State Treasurer, determines will provide the best combination of each of the following:

(1) The highest price for the State Compensation Insurance Fund’s workers’ compensation insurance assets and liabilities or the best value to the General Fund, or both.

(2) The greatest security for the payment of the purchase price.

(3) Demonstrated competence and professional qualifications for the continued satisfactory performance of the workers’ compensation insurance services offered for sale or other disposition.

(b) Prior to releasing any Notice of Request for Qualifications, a majority of the State Compensation Insurance Fund Board of Directors shall concur that the assets and liabilities that are identified by the Director of Finance, in consultation with the State Treasurer, in subdivision (a) are appropriate for sale or other disposition.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the process for sale or other disposition shall include the steps the director, in consultation with the State Treasurer, deems necessary or convenient to achieve the ends set forth in this section. The process shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The satisfaction of criteria established by the director, in consultation with the State Treasurer, consistent with achieving the best price or other value for those workers’ compensation insurance assets and liabilities. These criteria shall include any pertinent requirements of the State Compensation Insurance Fund Board of Directors.

(2) A Notice of Request for Qualifications sent by the Director of Finance to each firm currently providing workers’ compensation insurance coverage to California employers and any entity proposed by the State Compensation Insurance Fund Board of Directors. In addition, it shall be advertised in the State Contracts Register pursuant to Sections 14827.1 and 14827.2 of the Government Code. This notice shall include a description of the workers’ compensation insurance program, a summary description of the workers’ compensation insurance assets and liabilities offered for sale or other disposition, and a description of the due diligence review process to provide potential purchasers with further information regarding the workers’ compensation insurance assets and liabilities offered for sale or other disposition, the selection criteria on which the transaction will be based, the submission requirements and deadlines, and a Department of Finance contact name and telephone number for more information. A copy of the Notice of Request for Qualifications shall be provided to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within seven days of its release.

(3) The evaluation by the director, in consultation with the State Treasurer, of all statements timely submitted in response to the Notice of Request for Qualifications sent pursuant to paragraph (2), using the criteria contained in the notice, and, based on those statements, the establishment of a qualified participant list.

(4) For purposes of Section 11772, any action by the board of directors related to any transaction contemplated by this article, including, but not limited to, any approvals of such transactions, shall be deemed to be in good faith.

(5) The Director of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in writing within seven days of completing a sale pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 21.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

11885.3.

In order to accomplish the purpose of this article, the State Compensation Insurance Fund and its board of directors shall participate fully in good faith with the Director of Finance, and the Director of Finance shall act in good faith in carrying out the duties prescribed by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 21.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

11885.5.

Notwithstanding any other law, the approval of neither the Attorney General, nor the Insurance Commissioner, nor the Director of General Services is required for execution and implementation of the sale or other disposition of the assets and liabilities of the State Compensation Insurance Fund or any other agreement authorized by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 21.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

11885.7.

(a) The Director of Finance shall deposit all proceeds of any sale of, or any funds achieved through any other disposition of, the State Compensation Insurance Fund’s workers’ compensation insurance assets and liabilities under this article, less any costs related to that transaction, into the General Fund.

(b) The proceeds of any sale of, or any funds achieved through any other disposition of, the State Compensation Insurance Fund’s workers’ compensation insurance assets and liabilities are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in subdivision (c) of Section 8 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution. The disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 21.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

11885.9.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance is authorized to enter into agreements with firms or individuals to act as advisers to the state in the transactions contemplated by this article. Section 14838 of the Government Code and Article 4 (commencing with Section 10335) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code do not apply to any agreement entered into by the director with advisers pursuant to this section.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance is also authorized to enter into legal services agreements to obtain specialized legal advice related to the transactions contemplated by this article. Section 11040 of the Government Code and Section 6072 of the Business and Professions Code shall not apply to the legal services agreements entered into by the director pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 21.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

11886.

(a) The Director of Finance, in consultation with the State Treasurer, shall select firms or individuals to provide advisory services based on demonstrated competence and professional qualifications necessary for the satisfactory performance of the services required and in the manner described in this section.

(b) The Director of Finance, in consultation with the State Treasurer, shall establish selection criteria for selecting advisers. The criteria may include, but are not necessarily limited to, factors such as professional excellence, demonstrated competence, specialized experience in performing similar services, education and experience of key personnel to be assigned, staff capability, ability to meet schedules, nature and quality of similar completed work of the firm or individual, reliability and continuity of the firm or individual, and other considerations deemed by the director, in consultation with the State Treasurer, to be relevant and necessary to the performance of advisory services.

(c) In order to select advisers, the director shall publish a Notice of Request for Qualifications in the State Contracts Register pursuant to Sections 14827.1 and 14827.2 of the Government Code. The notice shall include a description of the advisory services required, the selection criteria on which the contract award will be based, submission requirements and deadlines, and a Department of Finance contact name and telephone number for more information. A copy of the Notice of Request for Qualifications shall be provided to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within seven days of publication in the State Contracts Register.

(d) (1) After the final response date stated in the Notice of Request for Qualifications, the Director of Finance, in consultation with the State Treasurer, shall review the responses submitted, and shall evaluate them using the criteria contained in the notice. The director shall rank, in order of preference based on the criteria contained in the notice, the firm or individuals determined to be qualified to perform the required services.

(2) The Director of Finance, in consultation with the State Treasurer, may interview any of the qualified firms or individuals regarding the experience and qualifications of those firms or individuals, as well as anticipated concepts and the benefits of alternative methods of furnishing the required services.

(e) (1) Following the interviews, if any, held pursuant to subdivision (d), the Director of Finance shall adjust the ranking of the qualified individuals or firms to reflect those firms or individuals deemed to be the most highly qualified to perform the required services.

(2) The Director of Finance, in consultation with the State Treasurer, shall enter into negotiations with the firm or individual most highly ranked pursuant to paragraph (1). If negotiations are concluded successfully, the director shall enter into a contract. If the director, in his or her sole discretion, concludes that the negotiations are unsuccessful, the director shall terminate the negotiations, and begin new negotiations, in consultation with the State Treasurer, with the other firms or individuals ranked pursuant to paragraph (1) in order of their ranking, and either contract with or terminate negotiations with each next most highly ranked firm or individual.

(3) If, after pursuing the negotiation process set forth in paragraph (2), the Director of Finance has been unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract at fair and reasonable compensation, the director may reinstate the selection process prescribed in this section, commencing with the issuance of a new Notice of Request for Qualifications.

(4) The Director of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in writing within seven days of entering into a contract with an individual or firm for advisory services.

(f) This section shall not apply to the selection of a legal services adviser.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 21.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

11886.2.

(a) The Director of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in writing upon his or her determination that neither the sale nor any other transaction authorized by this article is anticipated to achieve the purposes of this article or upon the completion of a disposition of State Compensation Insurance Fund assets and liabilities pursuant to this article.

(b) The Director of Finance shall cease those activities he or she is authorized or directed to undertake pursuant to this article upon the earlier of either:

(1) The 30th day following written notice by the director to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) January 10, 2012.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 21.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Market Assistance Program for Long-Term Health Care Facility Liability Insurance [11890. - 11892.]

11890.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Long-term health care facility” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 1418 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) “Residential care facilities for the elderly” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 1569.2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 899, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

11891.

(a) If the commissioner finds after a public hearing that liability insurance for long-term health care facilities, residential care facilities for the elderly, or physicians who provide or oversee the provision of services to residents in long-term health care facilities or residential care facilities for the elderly is not readily available in the voluntary insurance market, and that the public interest requires this availability, the commissioner may authorize the formation of a market assistance program to assist in securing that insurance for long-term health care facilities, residential care facilities for the elderly, or physicians who provide or oversee the provision of services to residents in long-term health care facilities or residential care facilities for the elderly. The commissioner may require insurers, agents, and brokers to attend public hearings and meetings concerning either the need for a market assistance program or the organization and formation of a program. The commissioner may also assist in securing insurance for long-term health care facilities, residential care facilities for the elderly, or physicians who provide or oversee the provision of services to residents in long-term health care facilities or residential care facilities for the elderly for which commercial liability insurance is not readily available by forming a risk pooling arrangement as permitted by the Federal Liability Risk Retention Act of 1986.

(b) The commissioner may develop appropriate standards and regulations to implement the market assistance program and risk pooling arrangement authorized by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 899, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

11892.

(a) The commissioner may order the creation of an unincorporated, not-for-profit, temporary joint underwriting association for liability insurance, constituting a legal entity separate and distinct from all its members. The purpose of the association shall be to provide a market for liability insurance on a self-supporting basis, without subsidy from association members.

(b) If the commissioner determines after a public hearing that liability insurance for long-term health care facilities, residential care facilities for the elderly, or physicians who provide or oversee the provision of services to residents in long-term health care facilities or residential care facilities for the elderly is readily available through the voluntary market, the association created pursuant to subdivision (a) shall cease its underwriting operations.

(c) The commissioner may develop appropriate standards and regulations to implement the joint underwriting association authorized by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 899, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Commercial Property: Vehicle Barrier Discount [11895. - 11895.]

11895.

(a) An insurer may consider the installation of vehicle barriers as a safety measure and may provide or offer a discount on the property owner’s insurance covering damage or loss to the covered commercial property or liability arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of the commercial property relative to the reduced risk to the property as a result of installation of the barriers if the discount provided or offered is provided or offered consistent with Article 10 (commencing with Section 1861.01) of Chapter 9 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(b) For the purposes of this section, a vehicle barrier is a safety device that meets, at a minimum, the vehicle impact protection standards as provided by the State Fire Marshal and adopted by the California Building
 Standards Commission and that is installed to protect persons located within, in, or on the property of, buildings, persons located in an adjacent outdoor area that is covered by the commercial property insurance policy and that is used for the purpose of outdoor dining, or to protect pedestrians, from collisions into those buildings or outdoor areas by motor vehicles.

(c) Any discounts on insurance provided in accordance with this section shall be determined to be actuarially sound and approved by the commissioner prior to their use.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 1989)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. MISCELLANEOUS CASUALTY INSURANCES [12050. - 12129.]



  CHAPTER 1. Surety Insurers on Reserve Basis; Capital Requirements and Permitted Insurances [12050. - 12122.]



  ARTICLE 1. Capital and Scope of Business [12050. - 12055.]

12050.

An incorporated insurer issuing surety policies on the reserve basis shall be governed by the paid-in capital and surplus requirements of Sections 700. 01 to 700.05, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 958.)
-------------------------------------------

12051.

During the first three years following its admission, the insurer’s assets in an amount equal to its required paid-in capital shall be in cash or in the value of obligations, purchase of which is approved by the commissioner, of the United States government, any State, or any county in this State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12052.

After such three-year period, investments of such insurers are subject only to the provisions of this code regulating generally the investments of other incorporated insurers issuing policies on a reserve basis.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12055.

An insurer admitted in the State to transact credit insurance may also acquire and dispose of debts so insured and collect any debts owed to such insurer or to any person so insured by it. In performing any such act the credit insurer shall be under the jurisdiction of the Insurance Commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 19.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administrative Control [12070. - 12072.]

12070.

The commissioner shall publish and maintain a complete list of all admitted surety insurers on the department’s public Web site. The list shall set forth all of the following:

(a) The full corporate name of the insurer.

(b) The name of the state or country under whose laws the insurer is organized.

(c) The date of the certificate of authority issued to the insurer to transact surety insurance in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 351, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

12072.

(a) Whenever the insurer’s certificate of authority is surrendered, revoked, canceled, annulled, or suspended or whenever any such insurer, after such abrogation of its certificate again is admitted, the commissioner shall promptly update the list of admitted surety insurers on the department’s public Web site to include the name of the insurer and the date of that abrogation of, or of renewal of, the certificate.

(b) The list of admitted surety insurers maintained on the department’s public Web site may be used by county clerks and others to confirm the license status of surety insurers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 351, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Special Restrictions on Business [12090. - 12093.]

12090.

(a) An admitted surety insurer shall not become surety on any one undertaking, or accept reinsurance on such undertaking, when its liability thereon, in excess of the amount reinsured by it in an admitted insurer, amounts to more than ten percent of its capital and surplus as shown by its last statement on file in the office of the commissioner. 

(b) In determining its liability on an undertaking for purposes of subdivision (a), an admitted insurer may reduce its liability by either or both of the following: 

(1) Deposits with the surety insurer, in a manner acceptable to the commissioner, or by conveyance to it in trust for its protection, of assets that would qualify as admitted assets. 

(2) A clean and irrevocable letter of credit acceptable to the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1020, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12091.

Whenever a surety insurer fails to maintain such a financial condition that assets allowed under subdivision (a) are equal in value to the aggregate of the charges prescribed under subdivision (b), the commissioner shall act as prescribed in Section 12092.

(a) In estimating its condition the commissioner shall allow as assets only such as are allowed under law in force at the time of the estimate.

(b) The charges to be aggregated shall be:

(1) Eighty percent of the paid-in capital, but in no case less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

(2) All outstanding indebtedness.

(3) Provision for reinsuring all outstanding risks, estimated as prescribed in Section 985.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------

12092.

Whenever such an insurer fails to maintain the financial condition required by section 12091, the commissioner shall require the deficiency to be made up in sixty days. If it is not made up as required, he shall issue a certificate showing the extent of such deficiency. He shall publish the certificate once a week for three weeks, in a daily San Francisco paper. From the time of first publication until such deficiency is made up, the insurer shall not do business in this State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12093.

Whenever a surety insurer gives notice of cancellation of the coverage of an employee under a blanket fidelity bond, upon the request of the employee, the surety insurer, within 10 days of the request, shall furnish to the employee a statement setting forth the ground or grounds upon which the notice of cancellation is based. There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action shall arise against, any surety insurer, or its licensed investigative sources, for any statements made by it concerning any employee in a written notice required to be given pursuant to this section.

If the surety insurer fails to comply with the provisions of the first paragraph of this section, the employee may apply to the commissioner for a certificate of the facts or information desired and the commissioner shall act thereon in accordance with the provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 12950) of Chapter 2 of Division 3.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1931.)
-------------------------------------------


